Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 4
MANAGEMENT

Editor's note:

This article was added in 1990, and this part 4 was subsequently repealed and reenacted in 2004, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this part 4 prior to 2004, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii of this volume. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated.

7-80-401. Management of limited liability company.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, decisions with respect to a limited liability company shall be made by a majority of the members or, if the limited liability company has one or more managers, by a majority of the managers.

The consent of each member is necessary to:

Amend the articles of organization;

Amend the operating agreement; and

Authorize an act of the limited liability company that is not in the ordinary course of the business of the limited liability company.

A person or persons who will be admitted as a member or members pursuant to section 7-80-701 (2) may, by unanimous consent, amend the operating agreement to be effective immediately before the admission of the person or persons.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire part R&RE, p. 938, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(1) amended and (3) added, p. 857, § 21, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 7-80-401 as it existed prior to 2004.

7-80-402. Designation of managers.

The members of a limited liability company, the articles of organization of which provide that management of the limited liability company is vested in one or more managers, may designate one or more persons to be managers. A manager who is an individual shall be eighteen years of age or older. Managers may be designated and removed by the consent of a majority of the members.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire part R&RE, p. 939, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 857, § 22, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 7-80-402 as it existed prior to 2004.

7-80-403. Officers and other agents.

A limited liability company may have one or more officers or other agents with such titles, rights, duties, and authority as the limited liability company may determine. An officer or an agent who is an individual shall be eighteen years of age or older. Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, officers and other agents may be designated or removed, and their titles, rights, duties, and authority may be established, by the consent of a majority of the members or, if the limited liability company has one or more managers, by a majority of the managers.

Officers and other agents may be given authority to do any act that is not in the ordinary course of the business of the limited liability company only with the consent of all of the members.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire part R&RE, p. 939, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 857, § 23, effective July 1.

7-80-404. Duties of members and managers.

In addition to the duties established elsewhere in this article, the duties that each member in a limited liability company in which management is vested in the members and that each manager owes to the limited liability company include the duties to:

Account to the limited liability company and hold as trustee for it any property, profit, or benefit derived by the member or manager in the conduct or winding up of the limited liability company business or derived from a use by the member or manager of property of the limited liability company, including the appropriation of an opportunity of the limited liability company;

Refrain from dealing with the limited liability company in the conduct or winding up of the limited liability company business as or on behalf of a party having an interest adverse to the limited liability company; and

Refrain from competing with the limited liability company in the conduct of the limited liability company business before the dissolution of the limited liability company.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2006, p. 857, § 24, effective July 1, 2006.)

Each member in a limited liability company, the articles of organization of which provide that management is vested in the members, and each manager owes to the limited liability company a duty of care in the conduct and winding up of the business of the limited liability company, which shall be limited to refraining from engaging in grossly negligent or reckless conduct, intentional misconduct, or a knowing violation of law.

Each member and each manager shall discharge the member's or manager's duties to the limited liability company and exercise any rights consistently with the contractual obligation of good faith and fair dealing.

A member in a limited liability company, the articles of organization of which provide that management is vested in the members, or a manager does not violate a duty or obligation to the limited liability company solely because the member's or manager's conduct furthers the member's or manager's own interest.

A member or a manager may lend money to, and transact other business with, the limited liability company, and as to each loan or transaction the rights and obligations of the member or manager may be exercised or performed in the same manner as those of a person who is not a member or manager, subject to other applicable law.

A member is not entitled to remuneration for services performed for the limited liability company except for reasonable compensation for services rendered in winding up the business of the limited liability company.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire part R&RE, p. 939, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 857, § 24, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

(6) added, (HB 16-1329), ch. 242, p. 989, § 4, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 7-80-406 as it existed prior to 2004.

7-80-405. Members and managers as agents of the limited liability company.

If the articles of organization provide that management of the limited liability company is vested in one or more managers:

A member is not an agent of the limited liability company and has no authority to bind the limited liability company solely by virtue of being a member; and

Each manager is an agent of the limited liability company for the purposes of its business and an act of a manager, including the execution of an instrument in the name of the limited liability company, for apparently carrying on in the ordinary course the business of the limited liability company or business of the kind carried on by the limited liability company binds the limited liability company, unless the manager had no authority to act for the limited liability company in the particular matter and the person with whom the manager was dealing had notice that the manager lacked authority.

If the articles of organization provide that management of the limited liability company is vested in the members, each member is an agent of the limited liability company for the purposes of its business and an act of a member, including the execution of an instrument in the name of the limited liability company, for apparently carrying on in the ordinary course the business of the limited liability company or business of the kind carried on by the limited liability company binds the limited liability company, unless the member had no authority to act for the limited liability company in the particular matter and the person with whom the member was dealing had notice that the member lacked authority.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire part R&RE, p. 940, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 858, § 25, effective July 1.

7-80-406. Business transactions of member or manager with the limited liability company. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire part R&RE, p. 940, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

Entire section repealed, p. 884, § 87, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section was similar to former § 7-80-409 as it existed prior to 2004.

7-80-407. Reimbursement and indemnification of members and managers.

A limited liability company shall reimburse a person who is or was a member or manager for payments made, and indemnify a person who is or was a member or manager for liabilities incurred by the person, in the ordinary course of the business of the limited liability company or for the preservation of its business or property, if such payments were made or liabilities incurred without violation of the person's duties to the limited liability company.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire part R&RE, p. 940, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 859, § 26, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 7-80-410 as it existed prior to 2004.

7-80-408. Access to and confidentiality of information - records - accounting.

Each member of a limited liability company has the right, subject to such reasonable standards as may be established by the members or managers pursuant to section 7-80-401 (1), to inspect and copy at the expense of the requesting member the following records of the limited liability company from time to time upon reasonable demand for any purpose reasonably related to the member's interest as a member of the limited liability company:

True and full information regarding the business and financial condition of the limited liability company, including written resolutions and minutes, if any, of the limited liability company;

A copy of the limited liability company's federal, state, and local income tax returns for each year;

A current list of the name and last-known business, residence, or mailing address of each member and manager;

A copy of the limited liability company's articles of organization and a copy of any written operating agreement of the limited liability company;

True and full information regarding the amount of cash and a description and statement of the agreed value of any other property or services contributed by each member and that each member has agreed to contribute in the future, and the date on which each became a member; and

Other information regarding the affairs of the limited liability company as is just and reasonable.

Each manager shall have the right to examine all of the information described in paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section for a purpose reasonably related to the position of manager.

Each member of a limited liability company and each manager shall have the right to keep confidential from the members, for such period of time as the members or managers deem reasonable, any information that the members or managers reasonably believe to be in the nature of trade secrets or that the limited liability company is required by law or by agreement with a third party to keep confidential.

A limited liability company may maintain its records in other than a written form if such form is capable of conversion into written form within a reasonable time.

Any demand by a member under this section shall be in writing and shall state the purpose of the demand.

A member of a limited liability company shall have the right to have a formal accounting of limited liability company affairs whenever circumstances render it just and reasonable.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire part R&RE, p. 941, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(1)(d) and (3) amended, p. 859, § 27, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(6) added, p. 226, § 16, effective May 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 7-80-411 as it existed prior to 2004.